Mississippi, session 2026, HB1448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 43-19-50, Mississippi Code of 1972: 43-19-50.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases have the meanings provided in this subsection unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Claimant" means a person who makes a claim or requests payment from an insurer or who is otherwise entitled to an economic benefit from an insurer. (b) "Economic benefit" means a payment in which an individual is paid directly by an insurer as the payee or co-payee of a first-party or third-party claim, including, but not limited to, payments intended to prevent litigation, claim payments, awards, benefits, settlements or claims to insurance proceeds held by a third-party beneficiary.  "Economic benefit" does not include:  claims for actual repair, replacement or loss of real or personal property; claims for reimbursement to a claimant for payments made by the claimant to a vendor or repair facility for the actual repair, replacement or loss of use of real or personal property; benefits payable for actual expenses to a funeral service provider or facility; medical payments coverage under a motor vehicle liability policy; benefits payable under a limited benefit insurance policy for coverage of specified diseases or illnesses, dental or vision benefits, or indemnity coverage; benefits paid in accordance with a long term care benefit plan; or benefits paid on behalf of an individual directly to a retirement plan or an accelerated death benefit. (c) "First party claim" means a claim made by the insured or policyholder under an insurance policy or contract or by a beneficiary. (d) "Insurance claim data collection organization" means an organization that maintains a centralized database of information concerning insurance claims to assist insurers that subscribe to the database in processing claims and detecting and preventing fraud. (e) "Insurer" means a person who holds a certificate of authority to transact insurance business in this state. (f) "Obligor" means an individual who owes a duty to make payments under an order for support. (g) "Third party claim" means a claim to insurance proceeds or coverage brought by a third party to an insurance policy or contract. (2) Each insurer or insurance company described in Sections 83-19-1 and 83-7-1 and under the regulatory authority of the Department of Insurance shall exchange information with the Mississippi Department of Human Services ("department") in the manner prescribed by the department to verify whether a claimant owes debt for the support of one or more children.  The insurer or insurance company shall initiate the information exchange not later than ten (10) business days after the opening of a claim or request for payment that seeks an economic benefit for the claimant for Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more.  This requirement is limited to claims for negligence, personal injury, wrongful death and life insurance. (3) To the extent feasible, the department shall facilitate a secure electronic process to exchange information with insurers.  When the operation of the data match system results in a match for an obligor who owes past-due support, or when a claim is located through other means, the department may: (a) Encumber and seize assets payable to an obligor; and (b) Request, and shall receive, additional financial or other information, including account numbers, names and Social Security numbers on record for accounts, and account balances from an insurer or insurance company needed to establish, modify or enforce a support order. (4) Notice of an encumbrance initiated by the department under this section must be provided to the insurer, insurance company and Department of Insurance via electronic means or regular mail.  Notice must be delivered by the department to the obligor via regular mail at the current mailing address as recorded by the department at the commencement of the encumbrance described in this section. (5) If an insurer is notified by the department that a claimant owes debt for the support of one or more children, the insurer, upon receipt of a notice issued by the enforcing authority identifying the amount of debt owed, must: (a) Notify the claimant and the claimant's attorney, if known, of the debt owed, no later than ten (10) business days after receiving notice from the enforcing authority; and (b) Upon the determination and issuance of an economic benefit payment due to the claimant, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, withhold the amount currently due at the time of issuance and remit the withheld funds directly to the enforcing authority within ten (10) business days. (6) When an insurer withholds and remits money to the enforcing authority pursuant to subsection (5), the insurer shall notify the claimant and claimant's attorney, if known, of that fact. (7) An amount encumbered and forwarded by the insurer or insurance company under this section may not exceed the arrearage owed by the obligor. (8) Priority over the withholding of payments pursuant to subsection (5) must be given to: (a) Claimant attorney's fees or costs incurred, if any;  and (b) Judgment, statutory or subrogation liens for medical expenses incurred as a result of the injury causing the claim. (9) Information obtained pursuant to this section may be used only for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section and shall become a record subject to the confidentiality and privacy requirements of Section 43-19-45 and any other applicable state or federal laws or regulations.  Disclosure of the information for any other purpose is prohibited.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, an insurer or an insurance claim data collection organization approved by the department or other entity that performs the functions described in this section may not be held liable in a civil or criminal action under federal or state law for an act made in good faith pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to: (a) A disclosure of information to the department or the federal Office of Child Support Services; or (b) The withholding of money or the remittance of money to the enforcing authority. (10) For claims filed before July 1, 2026, an insurer shall not delay the disbursement of a payment on a claim for the purpose of complying with the requirements of this section.  An insurer is not required to comply with subsection (5) and will not be subject to penalty if the notice issued by the enforcing authority is received by the insurer after the insurer has disbursed the payment on the claim.  In the case of a claim that will be paid through periodic payments, the insurer: (a) Is not required to comply with the provisions of subsection (5) with regard to those payments disbursed to the claimant before the notice was received by the insurer; and (b) Shall comply with the provisions of subsection (5) with regard to those payments on the claim scheduled to be made after the receipt of the notice. (11) The insurer may comply with the requirements of this section by:  reporting directly to the department or its designee; or authorizing the insurance claim data collection organization to provide claimant information to the federal Office of Child Support Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (12) An insurer that fails to comply with this section or which willfully renders false information is liable for a penalty to the department in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) upon conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction.  In addition to the penalty, an insurer that fails to exchange information or that fails or refuses to surrender property subject to a child support lien to the department is liable for the amount of the child support which should have been withheld and paid to the department. (13)  Before July 1, 2027, insurers and insurance companies are required to fully comply with the requirements of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.